Mississippi statutes. Title 29. Public Lands, Buildings and Property
In General
§ 29-1-57.
Sale of buildings, personal property and land associated with tax lands; factors Secretary of State may consider in determining sale price for land.

Where tax-forfeited lands have situated thereon buildings or personal property which are deteriorating, the Secretary of State may sell and dispose of the buildings, personal property and land for any consideration he may deem reasonable, irrespective of the amount of taxes for which same was sold. Where the buildings or personal property have deteriorated to the condition they are unsafe or constitute a nuisance, the Secretary of State, in determining the sales price for the land, may take into account the cost of cleanup and removal of the buildings and personal property situated thereon, or may contract with the purchaser for cleanup and removal of the buildings and personal property as part of the consideration for sale of the land.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4132; Laws, 1942, ch. 235; Laws, 1994, ch. 583, § 6; Laws, 2012, ch. 339, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 29-1-59.
Sale price of swamp and overflowed lands.

The minimum sale price of the swamp and overflowed lands is one dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) per acre, and the land commissioner may sell them at that price unless the governor and land commissioner deem any of said lands to be worth more than said sum, in which event it will be their duty to fix the price of such of said lands at what they shall believe the interest of the state to require. When the price has been so fixed, it shall be entered of record on the register containing the list of such lands for sale, and shall not be reduced within two (2) years thereafter nor sold at any other price, until changed in like manner.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2574; 1906, § 2912; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5247; 1930, § 6030; 1942, § 4112.

§ 29-1-61.
Sale price of internal improvement lands.

The internal improvement lands may be sold by the land commissioner at the same price as the swamp and overflowed lands, subject to be fixed in the same manner and under like regulations.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2575; 1906, § 2913; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5248; 1930, § 6031; 1942, § 4113.

§ 29-1-63.
Sale price of Chickasaw school lands.

The Chickasaw school lands are to be sold by the land commissioner at the price of not less than Six Dollars ($6.00) per acre unless said lands are situated in a levee district outside of and unprotected by the levees, in which case they shall be sold for not less than One and Twenty-five Hundredths Dollars ($1.25) per acre.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2576; 1906, § 2914; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5249; 1930, § 6032; 1942, § 4121.

§ 29-1-65.
Sale price of other lands.

All lands fallen or falling to the state by escheat, or coming to it in any other manner; all lands belonging to the State of Mississippi which were ceded to the State of Mississippi by the United States government for a seat of government which are located in Pearl River swamp and subject to overflow, and all other seat of government lands which have been surveyed into blocks and lots in the City of Jackson, Mississippi, which were a part of the original lands ceded by the federal government to the State of Mississippi for a seat of government and which have never been disposed of by the State of Mississippi; and all accretions near the mouth of the Pascagoula River, heretofore surveyed by the state; and all other lands within the borders of the state, not belonging to the United States nor owned by another, are property of the state and are to be managed and disposed of through the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State, with the approval of the Governor, may sell any of such lands, (except as otherwise provided in this chapter), at the same price as the swamp and overflow lands, subject to be fixed in the same manner and under like regulations.

Provided that all lands belonging to the State of Mississippi which were ceded to the State of Mississippi by the United States government for a seat of government which are located in Pearl River swamp and subject to overflow, and all other seat of government lands which have been surveyed into blocks and lots in the City of Jackson, Mississippi, which were a part of the original lands ceded by the federal government to the State of Mississippi for a seat of government and which have never been disposed of by the State of Mississippi, shall not be sold by the Secretary of State, with the approval of the Governor, unless and until the Legislature by legislative act shall have approved the sale of such seat of government lands, or any part thereof.

If, subsequent to the sale of lands specified in this section, the State of Mississippi shall purchase or otherwise reacquire such lands, the lands so acquired shall return to its previous status and be known as lands originally ceded to the State of Mississippi by the United States government for a seat of government.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2580; 1906, § 2919; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5254; 1930, § 6034; 1942, § 4123; Laws, 1936, ch. 174; Laws, 1948, ch. 490; Laws, 2008, ch. 465, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2008.

§ 29-1-67.
Sale of lands in municipalities.

Land situated within municipalities which has once been patented either by the United States government or the State of Mississippi, and the title to which has thereafter, by escheat, tax sale, or otherwise become vested in the State of Mississippi, may be sold or contracted for sale by the land commissioner, with the approval of the governor, at such price and under such terms and conditions as they may fix, even though it may have been subdivided into lots, blocks, divisions, or otherwise and escheated, or was sold to the state by such description. In selling such lands and the improvements thereon, if any, the land commissioner shall take into consideration the location thereof and the improvements situated thereon, and may ask and obtain greater prices therefor than for other lands.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6035; 1942, § 4124; Laws, 1926, ch. 185; Laws, 1936, ch. 174.

§ 29-1-69.
Sale of certain lands sold by municipalities.

Lands situated in municipalities which have heretofore escheated to or titles thereto become vested in the state, and which have been sold by the land commissioner of the state at a fair and reasonable price but under invalid patents, may be conveyed to the original holder of the patents or, if he has sold same, to his vendee at such reasonable price as the land commissioner with the approval of the governor and the attorney general shall fix; and such purchaser shall be allowed as credit on such price the amount heretofore paid therefor, with six percent (6%) interest compounded annually on the same not to exceed the present value as fixed by such officers. And no land heretofore sold, or attempted to be sold, shall again be sold until a period of thirty (30) days after the mailing of notice by registered mail to the original buyer or his vendee, if his post-office address is known, informing such buyer or his vendee of his rights hereunder. Whenever the post office address of such person is not known, notice shall be published in a newspaper published in the county where the land is located, once a week for two (2) weeks, giving a description of such land and of the rights of such buyers or their vendees. No deed shall be made to such buyer or his vendee until such person shall make affidavit that he bought the same in good faith and has not since sold his interest therein.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6036; 1942, § 4125; Laws, 1926, ch. 185; Laws, 1936, ch. 174.

§ 29-1-71.
Sale of lands for municipal defense projects.

When it is sufficiently shown to the Governor and Secretary of State that any tax-forfeited or escheated lands owned by the state, whether within or without the corporate limits of any municipality if located within ten (10) miles thereof, are needed by any municipality in connection with any national defense project which such municipality is sponsoring, the Secretary of State with the approval of the Governor is hereby authorized to sell on an acreage basis any such lands so owned by the state to any municipality, without limit as to quantity or manner in which such land is subdivided, for such price as the Secretary of State with the approval of the Governor may fix. Provided, however, that the minimum price for such land shall be One Dollar ($1.00) per acre. The conveyance of such lands by the state shall be by patent executed by the Secretary of State under the seal of the land office, which patent shall contain all of the lands sold, and such patent shall convey to the municipality a fee simple title to the lands therein described.

In the event the price for which such land is sold is not sufficient to pay the fees and costs allowed to the county tax collector and chancery clerk, as in cases of the redemption of lands for tax sales, under the provisions of Section 25-7-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, the Secretary of State shall apportion the purchase money derived from the sale of such lands hereunder between the county tax collector and chancery clerk upon the basis of the amount of fees due each of them, and the sum thus allotted shall be paid in the manner provided in Section 29-1-95, Mississippi Code of 1972, and shall be in full settlement of all fees due such officers.

Municipalities buying lands hereunder shall not be required to file the application required by Section 29-1-37, Mississippi Code of 1972, and such application as the municipality may file to purchase land hereunder may be promptly acted upon by the Governor and Secretary of State.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4126; Laws, 1942, ch. 171; Laws, 1990, ch. 420, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 29-1-73.
Quantity purchased by one person.

One person may purchase or contract to purchase as much as one-quarter (1/4) section of the public lands in one year, and no more (except Lowry Island lands, which are not to be limited as to amount purchased); and all lands acquired, directly or indirectly, by any person in contravention of this chapter shall escheat to the state, and all moneys and fees paid therefor shall be forfeited.

The restrictions herein contained limiting to one-quarter (1/4) section the quantity of land which may be purchased by any person in one (1) year shall not apply in any manner to the original owner or mortgagee of state forfeited tax lands at the time title matured in the state, nor to his heirs, executors, or administrators; nor shall such restriction apply to the board of drainage commissioners of any drainage district in the purchase of lands situated in such drainage district, as provided in Section 51-33-45, nor to the United States government in the purchase of lands under the provisions of Section 3-5-11, or under the provisions of other laws authorizing the sale of such lands to the United States government.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2564; 1906, § 2902; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5237; 1930, § 6026; 1942, §§ 4088, 4108; Laws, 1936, ch. 174; Laws, 1942, ch. 235.

§ 29-1-75.
Who may not purchase public lands [Repealed effective July 1, 2022].

Except as otherwise provided in this section, neither a corporation nor a nonresident alien, nor any association of persons composed in whole or in part of nonresident aliens, shall directly or indirectly purchase or become the owner of any of the public lands; and every patent issued in contravention hereof shall be void.

A banking corporation owning such tax-forfeited lands or holding a mortgage or deed of trust thereon at the time of the sale to the state, and whose mortgage or deed of trust is still in force and effect, may purchase such lands, regardless of acreage, owned by it as aforesaid or on which it held a mortgage or deed of trust. In event of a purchase by such corporation as a mortgagee, such lands shall be held for the benefit of the mortgagor subject to all the terms and conditions of the mortgage or deed of trust held by the purchasing banking corporation and, upon payment of the debt secured by such mortgage or deed of trust, together with interest and incidents, such banking corporation shall in that event reconvey such lands to the original mortgagor, his heirs or assigns.

Any other nonbanking corporation may purchase lands sold or forfeited to the state for delinquent taxes under any section of Chapter 1, Title 29, specifically relating to the sale of such tax-forfeited lands by the Secretary of State. A nonbanking corporation purchasing land sold or forfeited to the state shall be subject to the acreage limitations of Section 29-1-73.

Nonresident aliens may acquire and hold not to exceed three hundred twenty (320) acres of public lands in this state for the purpose of industrial development thereon. In addition, any nonresident alien may acquire and hold not to exceed five (5) acres of public lands for residential purposes. If any land acquired by a nonresident alien for the purpose of industrial development ceases to be used for industrial development, it shall escheat to the public body that sold such land to the nonresident alien.

This section shall stand repealed on July 1, 2022.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2563; 1906, § 2901; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5236; 1930, § 6027; 1942, § 4109; Laws, 1938, Ex. ch. 79; Laws, 1988, ch. 439, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 453, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 414, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2016; Laws, 2019, ch. 331, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 29-1-77.
Sale or lease to highway commission.

The land commissioner with the approval of the Governor is hereby authorized to sell, lease, or donate to the State Highway Commission or to any county or counties or the Natchez Trace Commission, for right of way purposes or for road material used or useful in the construction or maintenance of state, federal, and county highways, any of the public lands of the state, regardless of the quantity of said lands.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4092; Laws, 1936, ch. 174.

§ 29-1-79.
How purchase money paid.

The Secretary of State shall receive the purchase money of lands, which purchase money shall be paid into the Treasury. In the event a patent has not been finally completed within thirty (30) days after purchase money has been paid to the Secretary of State, then, upon written request to the Secretary of State by the party making the application to purchase state land, there shall be refunded all money, less fees provided under this chapter, paid upon the application to purchase state land. The Secretary of State shall issue a warrant upon the State Treasurer for the sum of money to be refunded; the warrant shall be paid as all other warrants are paid. The application upon which any money is refunded shall be void, and no patent shall be granted thereon.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2582; 1906, § 2921; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5256; 1930, § 6041; 1942, §§ 4089, 4138; Laws, 1936, ch. 174; Laws, 1940, ch. 212; Laws, 2015, ch. 305, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 29-1-81.
Issuance of patents and contracts.

All conveyances of land by the state in fee shall be by patent issued from the Secretary of State’s office; every patent issued shall be under the great seal, signed by the Secretary of State.

The patent shall be issued by the Office of the Secretary of State and delivered to the patentee. A copy thereof shall be retained by the Secretary of State among the records of his office.

The Secretary of State may file the original patent with the chancery clerk and such filing shall constitute the delivery of the patent to the patentee. Prior to filing the original patent, the Secretary of State shall collect from the patentee the sum of Twenty Dollars ($20.00) to cover the cost of filing the patent. Failure of the Secretary of State to file the patent shall not affect its validity.

All contracts of sale of public lands shall be issued from the Secretary of State’s office in duplicate; and every contract issued shall be under the great seal, signed by the Secretary of State and countersigned by the Governor.

No more than one-quarter (1/4) section of land shall be embraced in the same patent or contract, except as otherwise provided by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2561; 1906, § 2899; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5234; 1930, § 6024; 1942, § 4106; Laws, 1936, ch. 174; Laws, 1942, ch. 235; Laws, 1978, ch. 458, § 22; Laws, 1990, ch. 420, § 2; Laws, 2003, ch. 331, § 2; Laws, 2016, ch. 414, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 29-1-83.
Land sold by the state to be assessed for taxes.

When a patent shall issue for public lands, the land commissioner shall notify the clerk of the chancery court and the tax assessor of the county in which it is situated of the fact, giving the name of the patentee, a description of the land, and the price per acre. Said land shall, after January 1st of the next year after issuance of patents, be assessed for taxes as other lands are.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2573; 1906, § 2911; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5246; 1930, § 6025; 1942, § 4107; Laws, 1942, ch. 235.

§ 29-1-85.
Failure of title to public lands.

If the title to any public land sold by the state through the State Fiscal Officer or Secretary of State or by any municipality, except land forfeited to the state for the nonpayment of ad valorem taxes, shall fail, or shall have failed, the state or the municipality, as the case may be, shall refund the purchase-money to its vendee or his heirs or assigns; and if no profits have been received from the lands, then all taxes shall be returned also, and all fees paid, with interest at six percent (6%) per annum. Except as provided in this chapter, the question of failure of title can only be determined in a suit filed in the county in which the land is situated, and the Secretary of State or the municipality, as the case may be, shall be made a party to the suit. Where the failure of title shall have been caused by the cancellation of a contract or a patent issued by the state, or a deed from the municipality, under the requirements of any law or decree of a chancery court of this state, directing cancellation in favor of prior purchasers, or through the failure of the state’s title, or the title of the municipality, as the case may be, where the failure shall have been caused by the striking of the land from the state land rolls under the requirements of any law of this state, the failure of title so caused shall not be required to be determined by decree of court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2588; 1906, § 2927; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5262; 1930, § 6045; 1942, §§ 4134, 4142; Laws, 1900, ch. 65; Laws, 1942, ch. 235; Laws, 1948, ch. 494, § 1; Laws, 2018, ch. 309, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 5, 2018).

§ 29-1-87.
Patents cancelled where state has no title; refund to purchasers for cancelled patents; determination of failure of title.

If the State of Mississippi, through the State Fiscal Officer or Secretary of State's office, has heretofore issued or shall hereafter issue a patent or patents for any lands to which the state holds no title, or which did not belong to it at the time of the issuance of the patent or patents, or any part of which land may have caved into the river before the issuance of the patent or patents, or by oversight or otherwise two (2) patents may have been or may hereafter be issued therefor, the Secretary of State shall investigate the case and report to the Attorney General, who, if he shall find the lands so patented did not belong to the state, shall so report to the Secretary of State. If the Secretary of State shall find that such lands or any part thereof had caved into the river before the issuance of the patent, or that the patentee did not acquire any land or title under the patent, he shall mark the patent or patents or, in case of the loss of the original, a certified copy of the patents, “cancelled,” and refund the purchaser the amount paid to and retained by the state for the cancelled patent or patents, if any. The Secretary of State shall certify all cancellations to the clerk of the chancery court of the county in which the patents have been recorded, and the clerk shall thereupon cancel the record of it. That part of the purchase price paid to local governmental entities by the Secretary of State shall be refunded to the purchaser of the lands by the local governmental entities that received the funds. Any fees paid to the local governmental entities shall be refunded to the purchaser by the recipient of the fees. When only a part of the purchase-money is refunded, it shall be first noted by the Secretary of State in ink across the face of the patent and then noted by the chancery clerk upon the record of patent, cancelling it in that proportion only.

Except as provided in this chapter, the question of failure of title can only be determined in a suit filed in the county in which the land is situated, and the Secretary of State or municipality, as the case may be, shall be made a party to the suit. Where the failure of title shall have been caused by the cancellation of a contract or a patent issued by the state under the requirements of any law or decree of a chancery court of this state directing cancellation in favor of prior purchasers, or through the failure of the state’s title, as the case may be, where the failure shall have been caused by the striking of the land from the state land rolls under the requirements of any law of this state, the failure of title so caused shall not be required to be determined by decree of court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 2947; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5282; 1930, § 6046; 1942, § 4143; Laws, 1904, p. 183; Laws, 1942, ch. 235; Laws, 2018, ch. 309, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 5, 2018).

§ 29-1-89.
Certain entries cancelled.

If it appear to the land commissioner that any land has been sold and patented to several parties, he shall report the facts to the legislature, with information of the amount of purchase-money to be refunded, and ask for an appropriation therefor if, in his opinion, the state had received and ought to refund anything.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2585; 1906, § 2924; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5259; 1930, § 6048; 1942, § 4146.

§ 29-1-91.
Taxes remain a charge on redeemed land.

If the state’s title to any land certified into the land office fail, and the land be reclaimed or redeemed before or after sale by the state, the taxes for which it was sold and the taxes for each subsequent year and all officers’ fees shall remain and become a charge upon the land as if it had been regularly assessed to the owner in each of said years.

If the title to any land purchased by any municipality under any provisions of Sections 21-33-69, 21-33-73, or 21-37-49 shall fail, and the land be reclaimed before or after any sale by the municipality, the municipal, municipal separate school, and/or special improvement or other taxes for which it was sold, and any and all of such taxes for any subsequent year, and all officers’ fees shall remain and become a charge upon such land, subordinate only to state and county taxes, as if it had been regularly assessed to the owner in each of said years.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3869; 1906, § 4376; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7015; 1930, § 6043; 1942, § 4140; Laws, 1948, ch. 494, § 2.

§ 29-1-93.
Fees of county officers.

The fees of all county officers allowed by law in connection with land sold to the state for taxes shall be paid by the state when such land shall be sold by the state. Upon such sale the land commissioner shall carefully calculate said fees and shall certify the same to the auditor who, if he finds the same correct, shall issue his warrants therefor to the proper persons; provided, that said fees shall lapse as to any land not sold within ten (10) years after the period of redemption has expired.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3868; 1906, § 4375; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7014; 1930, § 6042; 1942, § 4139; Laws, 1940, ch. 130.

§ 29-1-95.
County, municipality, public school district, drainage district and levee board taxes; funding of agency expenses; deposit of monies into State General Fund and use of monies so deposited.

All taxes due the county, municipality, public school district, drainage district or levee board on lands sold to the state for taxes and listed into the Secretary of State’s office shall remain in abeyance until the land be sold, and thereafter such taxes shall be paid out of the purchase money; but state, county, municipality, public school district, drainage district or levee board taxes shall not accrue on such lands after the fiscal year in which it was certified to the state. Upon the payment of the purchase money of any tax land into the Treasury, the Secretary of State shall certify to the Department of Finance and Administration and to the Treasurer the amount of fees and costs allowed to the county tax collector and chancery clerk, as in cases of the redemption of lands from tax sales, under the provisions of Section 25-7-21; and the Department of Finance and Administration shall issue warrants in favor of such county tax collector and chancery clerk for the amount of such fees. The Secretary of State shall also certify to the Department of Finance and Administration and the Treasurer the amount of the county, municipality, public school district, drainage district and levee board taxes for which said land was sold to the state, and all taxes accruing on said land until the year in which it was certified to the state; and the Department of Finance and Administration shall issue warrants in favor of the proper county, municipality, public school district, drainage district, and levee board for the said four (4) years’ taxes. The balance of the purchase money shall be deposited into a special fund to be known as the “Land Records Maintenance Fund,” that is hereby created in the State Treasury. The fund shall be administered by the Secretary of State. Any amount on hand in said Land Records Maintenance Fund at the end of the fiscal year that is not necessary to pay any obligations to local governmental units set out in this subsection shall, after June 30 of each year, be transferred to the General Fund, and shall not be authorized for expenditure by the Secretary of State to reimburse or otherwise defray the expenses of any office administered by the Secretary of State.

If, after the payment of the fees and costs allowed to the county tax collector and the chancery clerk, as aforesaid, the balance of the purchase money of any tax land paid into the Treasury shall be insufficient to cover the amount of the state, county, municipality, public school district, drainage district or levee board taxes due thereon, or if the records of the Secretary of State fail to show the amount of state, county, municipality, public school district, drainage district or levee board taxes accruing for the years until said land was certified to the state, on lands sold by the Secretary of State, he shall apportion the balance of the purchase money derived from the sale of such lands between the state, county, municipality, public school district, drainage district and levee board upon the basis of the amount of taxes due the state, county, municipality, public school district, drainage district and levee board, respectively, at the time said land was struck off to the state for delinquent taxes by the sheriff and tax collector, and for which said lands were struck off to the state.

All funds derived from the sale of properties under the provisions of Sections 7-11-15, 29-1-27, 29-1-29, 29-1-35, 29-1-37, 29-1-53 through 29-1-57, 29-1-73 and 29-1-81 through 29-1-87 shall be handled in the manner provided herein for funds derived from the sale of lands.

From and after July 1, 2016, the expenses of this agency shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund and all user charges and fees authorized under this section shall be deposited into the State General Fund as authorized by law. The requirements of this subsection (4) shall not apply to disbursements made to local governmental units from the Land Records Maintenance Fund, and to any funds which by law are to be collected and deposited to the Land Records Maintenance Fund.

From and after July 1, 2016, no state agency shall charge another state agency a fee, assessment, rent or other charge for services or resources received by authority of this section. This prohibition shall not apply to payments made from the Land Records Maintenance Fund provided for in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3867; 1906, § 4374; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7013; 1930, § 6044; 1942, § 4141; Laws, 1936, ch. 174; Laws, 1942, ch. 237; Laws, 1988, ch. 348; Laws, 1990, ch. 574, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 358, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 459, § 47; Laws, 2017, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 7, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved June 23, 2017).

§ 29-1-97.
Lien of drainage district or municipality not abated.

When any land is situated in a drainage district and is subject to any special drainage district assessment which is secured by a lien on said land, such lien shall not be abated or cancelled on account of the sale of such land to the state for delinquent taxes, but such lien shall be held in abeyance during the period the property is owned by the state and, immediately upon the title to the land passing from the state by virtue of a sale, such lien shall again become effective. And, likewise, when any land is situated in a municipality and is subject to any special municipal benefit assessment which is secured by a lien on the land, such lien shall not be abated or cancelled on account of the sale of such land to the state for delinquent taxes, but such lien shall be held in abeyance during the period such property is owned by the state and, immediately upon the title to the state passing from the state by virtue of a sale, such lien shall again become effective.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4090; Laws, 1936, ch. 174.

§ 29-1-99.
Easements for flood control, etc.

The land commissioner of the State of Mississippi, with the approval of the governor, is hereby authorized and empowered to grant or donate easements in and to the public lands of the state to any drainage district, flood control district, or to any county in this state, or to the United States or to any agency thereof, for the construction and the maintenance of flood control canals and ditches, or drainage canals and ditches, or other flood control or drainage instrumentalities.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4114; Laws, 1940, ch. 211.

§ 29-1-101.
Easements for pipe lines.

The Secretary of State, for and on behalf of the state, may convey an easement or easements for the construction and maintenance of pipe lines in, on, under, and across all of the state land owned (including that submerged or wherever the tide may ebb and flow) now or hereafter acquired, excepting, however, state highway rights-of-way, sixteenth section school land, lieu lands, and forfeited tax land and property the title to which is subject to any lawful redemption, and excepting the state land comprising the old asylum property located in the City of Jackson, property of the Department of Mental Health, the Parchman Penitentiary property located in Sunflower County, Mississippi, and all other Penitentiary property, to any person, firm, or corporation constructing or operating a refinery for the refining of oil, gas, or petroleum products in the state, or to any person, firm, or corporation transporting by pipe line any substance to or from any such refinery in this state, for such consideration as the Secretary of State deems just and proper, which shall be subject to approval by the Secretary of State, the Governor, and the Attorney General of the state, for easements in, on, under, and across the state-owned land.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4114-01; Laws, 1962, ch. 617, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 442, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 2008.

§ 29-1-103.
Liability for damages in construction of pipe lines.

No such pipe line shall be built or constructed in a manner to be dangerous to persons or property, nor in a manner to interfere with the common use of public lands, and the owner of any such pipe line shall be responsible in damages for any injury caused by construction or use of such pipe line.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4114-02; Laws, 1962, ch. 617, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 13, 1962).

§ 29-1-105.
Restrictions on construction or use of pipe lines.

The right to construct or use any such pipe line in, on, under, or across land which is submerged or whereover the tide may ebb and flow shall be subject to the following:

The paramount right of the United States to control commerce and navigation; and

The right of the public to make free use of the waters; and

The restrictions and prohibitions contained in Section 81 of the Mississippi Constitution of 1890.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4114-03; Laws, 1962, ch. 617, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 13, 1962).